apertium-mt-ar.ar.dix
    <pardef n="S__يترك/ه">
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ها</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ني</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هما</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ما</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هن</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>م</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نا</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__يشبه/ه">
      <e><p><l></l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ا</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ك</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ك</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ني</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ما</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كما</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>م</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كن</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نا</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Abbreviations -->
    <pardef n="abbr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->
    <pardef n="نعم__ij">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="و__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="لأن__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="أن__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هكذا__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>





    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e><p><l>أنا</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نحن</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>أنت</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>أنت</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>أنتم</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>أنتن</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هو</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هي</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هم</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هن</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ه__prn">
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ك</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ك</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ك</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ها</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كما</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هما</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نا</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كن</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هن</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ي/ه__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ك</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ك</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ك</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ها</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كما</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هما</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نا</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كن</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هن</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

<!--    <pardef n="כי__rel">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> -->

    <pardef n="כל__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="אחר__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="משהו__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="חלק__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="מי__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="כמה__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/هذا__prn">
      <e>       <p><l>هذا</l> <r>هذا<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>هذه</l> <r>هذا<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>هذان</l> <r>هذا<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>هتان</l> <r>هذا<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>هؤلاء</l><r>هذا<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>أولائك</l><r>هذا<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="لا"><i>نعم</i><par n="نعم__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="لا"><i>لا</i><par n="نعم__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="لا"><i>آمين</i><par n="نعم__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="أو"><i>أو</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="عندما"><i>عندما</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="لكن"><i>لكن</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="لذلك"><i>لذلك</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="إذا"><i>إذا</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="بينما"><i>بينما</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="منذ"><i>منذ</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="منذئذ"><i>منذئذ</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="وكذلك"><i>وكذلك</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="كأنما"><i>كأنما</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="بل"><i>بل</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="أن" r="RL"><p><l><a/>أن</l><r>أن</r></p><par n="أن__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="أن" r="LR"><i>أن</i><par n="أن__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="كي"><i>كي</i><par n="أن__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="رغم أن"><i>رغم<b/>أن</i><par n="أن__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ل" r="RL"><p><l><a/>ل</l><r>ل</r></p><par n="أن__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ل" r="LR"><i>ل</i><par n="أن__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="لأن"><i>لأن</i><par n="لأن__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="كما"><i>كما</i><par n="لأن__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="لكي"><i>لكي</i><par n="أن__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="الذي"><i>الذي</i><par n="لأن__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="إذا"><i>إذا</i><par n="لأن__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="هكذا"><i>هكذا</i><par n="هكذا__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="بينما"><i>بينما</i><par n="هكذا__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="لذلك"><i>لذلك</i><par n="هكذا__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="إذ"><i>إذ</i><par n="هكذا__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ماذا" c=""><i>ماذا</i><par n="חלק__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="هذا" c="this"><i></i><par n="/هذا__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="أحد"><i>أحد</i><par n="אחר__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="أخر" c="another"><i>آخر</i><par n="אחר__prn"/></e>
<e><p><l>شارك</l><r>شارك<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يترك/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تشارك</l><r>شارك<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يترك/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>أترك</l><r>ترك<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يترك/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>اترك</l><r>ترك<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يترك/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تترك</l><r>ترك<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يترك/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>أفرك</l><r>فرك<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يترك/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تفرك</l><r>فرك<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يترك/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>أمسك</l><r>أمسك<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يترك/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>أنتهك</l><r>انتهك<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يترك/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تنتهك</l><r>انتهك<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يترك/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>أكره</l><r>كره<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يشبه/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>نكره</l><r>كره<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__يشبه/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>اكره</l><r>كره<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يشبه/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>يكره</l><r>كره<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يشبه/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تكره</l><r>كره<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يشبه/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تكره</l><r>كره<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يشبه/ه"/></e>
